Utah statutes.
10-1-109.   Saving clause.
The repeal of the titles, chapters and sections specified in Section 10-1-114
shall not:
(1)  affect suits pending or rights existing immediately prior to the
effective date of this act;
(2)  impair, avoid, or affect any grant or conveyance made or right acquired
or cause of action now existing under any repealed act or amendment thereto;
or
(3)  affect or impair the validity of any bonds or other obligation issued or
sold prior to the effective date of this act.
The repeal of any validating act or part thereof shall not avoid the effect of
the validation. No act repealed by Section 10-1-114 shall repeal any act or
part thereof which embraces the same or similar subject matter as the act
repealed.
